Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.02
Applicability.

Sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 apply only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of such sections is inconsistent with sections 42-701 to 42-747.04, sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 control.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 49.